California, session 20252026, AB1675.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 25000) is added to Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read: CHAPTER 16. Corporations Contracting with the United States Department of Homeland Security and Its Agencies25000. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the No Tax Breaks for ICE Contractors Act of 2026.25001. For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply: (a) “Contracting corporation” means any taxpayer that contracts with the Department of Homeland Security, either directly or through subcontracts, to provide goods or services. services through the federal government procurement or contracting process that does not include goods or services acquired through a platform or mechanism available to the general public.(b) “Department of Homeland Security” refers to the United States Department of Homeland Security when the Department of Homeland Security is contracting on behalf of either the United States Customs and Border Protection or the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, and the following agencies that are an operational or support component of the department:(1) United States Customs and Border Protection.(2) United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.(3)Management Directorate.(c) “Nonprofit housing sponsor” has the same meaning as defined in Section 50091 of the Health and Safety Code.(d) “Nonprofit sponsored venture” means either a limited partnership in which a nonprofit housing sponsor or an entity wholly owned by a nonprofit housing sponsor is designated as the managing general partner, or a limited liability company in which a nonprofit housing sponsor or an entity wholly owned by a nonprofit housing sponsor is designated as the managing member.25002. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2032, a contracting corporation shall not be eligible to claim any credit provided under this part for the taxable year. year, except for the following:(a) A tax credit received by any direct or indirect partner or member of a nonprofit sponsored venture to which the claiming party has made a direct or indirect loan or capital contribution.(b) Any tax credit allowed pursuant to Section 12206, 17058, or 23610.5 directly or indirectly purchased from a nonprofit housing sponsor.25003. (a) (1) No later than June 1, 2027, the Franchise Tax Board, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall estimate the amount of revenue that would have resulted if the modifications made with respect to the eligibility for tax credits by this chapter had applied to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2027, and notify the Controller of that amount.(2) No later than June 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall estimate the amount of additional revenue resulting from the modifications made with respect to the calculation of taxable income by this chapter for the taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the estimate is made and before January 1 of the calendar year in which the estimate is made and notify the Controller of that amount.(b) (1) The California Immigrant Resilience Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.(2) Upon receiving the notifications from the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to subdivision (a), the Controller shall transfer an amount equal to the amount estimated by the Franchise Tax Board in those notifications from the General Fund to the California Immigrant Resilience Fund to be made available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants or contracts, and state operations, under the authority of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, with organizations qualified pursuant to that chapter, to provide immigration-related services, including removal defense.(c) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the board pursuant to this section.25004. This chapter shall remain operative only until December 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.